Nebraska, session 109, LB168.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Sections 1 to 5 of this act shall be known and may be cited as
the 340B Contract Pharmacy Protection Act.
Sec. 2. For purposes of the 340B Contract Pharmacy Protection Act:
(1) 340B drug means a drug that a 340B entity may purchase at a reduced
price pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 256b, as such section existed on January 1, 2025;
(2) 340B entity means a covered entity as defined in 42 U.S.C. 256b(a)(4),
as such section existed on January 1, 2025; and
(3) Manufacturer has the same meaning as in section 71-7438.
Sec. 3. (1) Any manufacturer, agent or affiliate of such manufacturer, or
third-party logistics provider of such manufacturer's drugs shall not, either
directly or indirectly, deny, restrict, or prohibit the acquisition of any 340B
drug by or delivery of any 340B drug to any location authorized by any 340B
entity to receive such 340B drug, unless receipt of such 340B drug is
prohibited by federal law.
(2) Any manufacturer, agent or affiliate of such manufacturer, or third-
party logistics provider shall not, either directly or indirectly, require any
340B entity to submit any data, including any claim data, utilization data,
encounter data, medical data, purchasing data, or other data, as a condition
for allowing the acquisition of any 340B drug by or delivery of any 340B drug
to any 340B entity or to any location authorized by any 340B entity to receive
such 340B drug, unless such data is required by federal law.
Sec. 4. The Attorney General or any county attorney may institute an
action in the name of the State of Nebraska for an injunction or other process
to restrain or prevent any violation of the 340B Contract Pharmacy Protection
Act.
Sec. 5. Nothing in the 340B Contract Pharmacy Protection Act shall be
construed or applied to conflict with federal law or any other law of the State
of Nebraska, if such law is compatible with applicable federal law.
Sec. 6. If any section in this act or any part of any section is declared
invalid or unconstitutional, the declaration shall not affect the validity or
constitutionality of the remaining portions.
Sec. 7. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when passed and
approved according to law.
-1-